Utah statutes.
34A-2-401.   Compensation for industrial accidents to be paid.

(1) An employee described in Section 34A-2-104 who is injured and the dependents of each such employee who is killed, by accident arising out of and in the course of the employee's employment, wherever such injury occurred, if the accident was not purposely self-inflicted, shall be paid:

(a)  compensation for loss sustained on account of the injury or death;

(b)  the amount provided in this chapter for:

(i)  medical, nurse, and hospital services;

(ii)  medicines; and

(iii)  in case of death, the amount of funeral expenses.

(2)  The responsibility for compensation and payment of medical, nursing, and hospital services and medicines, and funeral expenses provided under this chapter shall be:

(a)  on the employer and the employer's insurance carrier; and

(b)  not on the employee.

(3)  Payment of benefits provided by this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act, shall commence within 30 calendar days after any final award by the commission.

